District of Columbia statutes.
2-1207.02

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 33, 31 DCR 2514
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-236, § 5(a), 42 DCR 33
Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 31(b)(1), 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2212.
Section 33(b)(2) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided that § 31(b) shall take effect on the latter of: (A) the effective Dates of this act; or (B) the Dates determined by the Board, but not later than one year after the initial meeting of the Board.

Expiration of Law 10-236

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 10-236 provided that the act shall expire 3 years after having taken effect. D.C. Law 10-236, which had inserted paragraphs (3A), (7A), and (14A), became effective on March 21, 1995.